de: Form des Fahrzeugglasreinigers: Aerosol-Spray; Konzentrat; Schaumspray; Gel; Kit; Flüssigspray; Nachfüller; Reinigungstücher; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Formato do limpa-vidros para veículo: Spray em aerossol; Concentrado; Spray de espuma; Gel; Kit; Spray líquido; Recarga; Toalhitas; Outro
en: Vehicle glass cleaner form: Aerosol spray; Concentrate; Foaming spray; Gel; Kit; Liquid spray; Refill; Wipes; Other
sv: Produktformat för fordonsglasrengöring: Aerosolspray; Koncentrat; Skumspray; Gel; Kit; Flytande spray; Påfyllning; Våtservetter; Övrigt
fi: Ajoneuvon lasinpuhdistusaineen muoto: Aerosolisuihke; Tiiviste; Vaahtoava suihke; Geeli; Pakkaus; Nestesuihke; Täyttöpakkaus; Pyyhkeet; Muu
vi: Mẫu nước lau kính xe: Bình xịt khí nén; Đậm đặc; Bình xịt tạo bọt; Gel; Bộ; Bình xịt dạng lỏng; Refill; Khăn ướt; Khác
fr: Format du nettoyant pour vitres de véhicule: Vaporisateur en aérosol; Concentré; Vaporisateur moussant; Gel; Kit; Vaporisateur liquide; Recharge; Lingettes; Autre
ro-RO: Forma soluției de curățare a geamurilor auto: Spray aerosol; Concentrat; Spray cu spumă; Gel; Kit; Spray lichid; Rezervă; Șervețele umede; Altele
sl-SI: Obrazec za čiščenje stekla vozil: Aerosolno pršilo; Koncentrat; Peneče pršilo; Gel; Komplet; Tekoče pršilo; Polnilo; Robčki; Drugo
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės stiklų valiklio forma: Aerozolinis purškiklis; Koncentratas; Putojantis purškiklis; Gelis; Rinkinys; Skystas purškiklis; Papildymas; Servetėlės; Kita
el: Μορφή καθαριστικού τζαμιών οχήματος: Σπρέι αεροζόλ; Συμπύκνωμα; Σπρέι αφρού; Τζελ; Κιτ; Υγρό σπρέι; Ανταλλακτικό; Μαντηλάκια; Άλλο
es: Formato del limpiador de cristales para vehículos: Aerosol en spray; Concentrado; Spray espumoso; Gel; Kit; Spray líquido; Recarga; Toallitas húmedas; Otro
it: Formato del detergente per vetri dell'auto: Spray aerosol; Concentrato; Spray schiumogeno; Gel; Kit; Spray liquido; Ricarica; Salviette; Altro
tr: Araç cam temizleyici formu: Aerosol sprey; Konsantre; Köpük sprey; Jel; Kit; Sıvı sprey; Yedek; Mendil; Diğer
th: น้ำยาทำความสะอาดกระจกรถยนต์: สเปรย์กระป๋อง; เข้มข้น; สเปรย์โฟม; เจล; ชุดเครื่องมือ; สเปรย์น้ำ; รีฟิล; แผ่นเช็ดทำความสะอาด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Formulár na čistenie skla vozidla: Aerosólový sprej; Koncentrát; Penivý sprej; Gél; Súprava; Tekutý sprej; Náplň; Utierky; Iné
da: Form for bilruderens: Aerosolspray; Koncentrat; Skumspray; Gel; Sæt; Flydende spray; Refill; Servietter; Andet
pt-BR: Limpa-vidros automotivo forma: Spray em aerossol; Concentrado; Spray em espuma; Gel; Kit; Spray líquido; Refil; Lenços umedecidos; Outro
nl: Voertuigglasreiniger vorm: Spuitbus; Concentraat; Schuimspray; Gel; Kit; Vloeibare spray; Navulling; Doekjes; Overig
ja: 車両用ガラスクリーナー形態: エアロゾルスプレー; 濃縮; 泡スプレー; ジェル; キット; 液体スプレー; 詰め替え; ワイプ; その他
bg-BG: Тип препарат за почистване на автомобилни стъкла: Аерозолен спрей; Концентрат; Пенещ се спрей; Гел; Комплект; Течен спрей; Пълнител; Кърпички; Друго
hr-HR: Obrazac za čišćenje stakla vozila: Aerosolni sprej; Koncentrat; Sprej s pjenom; Gel; Komplet; Tekući sprej; Dopuna; Maramice; Ostalo
zh-TW: 車輛玻璃清潔劑型態: 氣霧噴劑; 濃縮液; 泡沫噴劑; 凝膠; 工具包; 液體噴劑; 補充包; 濕巾; 其他
ko: 차량 유리 세정제 형태: 에어로졸 스프레이; 농축액; 포밍 스프레이; 젤; 키트; 액상 스프레이; 리필; 물티슈; 기타
zh-CN: 车用玻璃清洁剂形态: 气雾喷雾; 浓缩液; 泡沫喷雾; 凝胶; 套件; 液体喷雾; 补充装; 湿巾; 其他
pl: Forma środka do szyb samochodowych: Aerozol; Koncentrat; Pianka w sprayu; Żel; Zestaw; Płyn w sprayu; Uzupełnienie; Chusteczki; Inne
ru: Форма очистителя автомобильных стекол: Аэрозольный спрей; Концентрат; Пенный спрей; Гель; Набор; Жидкий спрей; Запасной блок; Салфетки; Другое
cs: Forma čističe skel vozidel: Aerosolový sprej; Koncentrát; Pěnový sprej; Gel; Sada; Tekutý sprej; Náplň; Ubrousky; Jiné
nb: Form for glassrens for kjøretøy: Aerosolspray; Konsentrat; Skumspray; Gel; Sett; Flytende spray; Refill; Servietter; Annet
hu: Autóüveg-tisztítószer formája: Aeroszolos spray; Koncentrátum; Habzó spray; Gél; Készlet; Folyékony spray; Utántöltő; Törlőkendő; Egyéb